Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF113.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin APPROPRIATION; MINNESOTA BLACK FARMERS ASSOCIATION.new text end new text begin $1,363,000 in fiscal year 2026 and $1,363,000 in fiscal year 2027 are appropriated from the arts and cultural heritage fund to the commissioner of administration for grants to the Minnesota Black Farmers Association to preserve the cultural heritage of Black farmers in Minnesota. The grants are to be used at Mahogany Farm in Mora, Frog Tree Farm in Verndale, and the 40 Acre Co-op in Sandstone to develop and build greenhouses to foster a new generation of culturally aware farmers, enhance understanding of sustainable farm practices, and serve as community hubs for cultural and educational programming. Grant money may also be used to make improvements to the farmhouse at Mahogany Farm. new text end